Massachusetts, session 194th, H3635.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 17D the following new section:-
Section 17E. There shall be a twenty five per cent reduction in tolls charged to drivers
age 65 and over who drives on the Massachusetts Turnpike, the Tobin Bridge and/or the Ted
Williams Tunnel. In order to qualify for the reduction, the driver must be age 65 and over, the
driver must have a valid driver’s license recognized by the Registry of Motor Vehicles as a valid
license to drive in Massachusetts, and the driver must own or rent the passenger vehicle. The
driver is only allowed to apply the reduction to one passenger vehicle, which the driver must
own or rent. There shall be no application fee for a driver to apply and be approved for said
of 2

reduction. A person’s participation in the twenty five per cent toll reduction shall expire 60 days
after the expiration of the driver’s license. Said person shall be allowed to renew participation in
said reduction any time after the renewal of the driver’s license, including after the expiration of
the reduction.
Persons who do receive the reduction and allows an unauthorized driver to utilize said
reduction shall be fined $50 for the first violation, $100 for the second violation and $150 for the
third and subsequent violations. In addition to the fine for the third violation, the driver’s
authorization to receive a reduction shall be revoked permanently. The executive office of
transportation shall promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation of this section
within the existing toll collection system.
of 2